Washington statutes.
RCW 19.118.900

Effective dates—1987 c 344.

(1) Section 9 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 1, 1987.

(2) Sections 2 through 8, 10 through 12, and 14 through 16 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1988, except that the attorney general may take such actions as are necessary to ensure the new motor vehicle arbitration boards are established and operational.

[ 1987 c 344 s 22.]